public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX a ando vaga r[ei]ando
SFX a ando vagi r[ei]ando
SFX a ando vago/JL r[ei]ando
SFX a ando vai r[ei]ando
SFX a ando valo/B r[ei]ando
SFX a ando vao/JL r[ei]ando
SFX a ando vatu/O r[ei]ando
SFX a ao à/FNR [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]dao
SFX a ao àeƚo/B [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]dao
SFX a ao àelo/B [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]dao
SFX a ao àemi/K [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]dao
SFX a ao àgomi/K [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]dao
SFX a ao àomi/K [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]dao
SFX a ao aƚo/B [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]dao
SFX a ao alo/B [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]dao
SFX a ao atu/O [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]dao
SFX a o a/JLPR [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]dao
SFX a o e/JLR [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]dao
SFX a o ga [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]dao
SFX a o gi [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]dao
SFX a o go/JL [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]dao
SFX a o i [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]dao
SFX a o o/JL [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]dao
SFX a ào à/FNR r[ei]dào
SFX a ào aƚo/B r[ei]dào
SFX a ào aga r[ei]dào
SFX a ào agi r[ei]dào
SFX a ào ago/JL r[ei]dào
SFX a ào alo/B r[ei]dào
SFX a ào atu/O r[ei]dào
SFX a o a/JLPR r[ei]dào
SFX a o eƚo/B r[ei]dào
SFX a o e/JLR r[ei]dào
SFX a o elo/B r[ei]dào
SFX a o emi/K r[ei]dào
SFX a o gomi/K r[ei]dào
SFX a o i r[ei]dào
SFX a o o/JL r[ei]dào
SFX a o omi/K r[ei]dào
SFX a ào à/FNR dexdào
SFX a ào aƚo/B dexdào
SFX a ào aga dexdào
SFX a ào agi dexdào
SFX a ào ago/JL dexdào
SFX a ào alo/B dexdào
SFX a ào atu/O dexdào
SFX a o a/JLPR dexdào
SFX a o eƚo/B dexdào
SFX a o e/JLR dexdào
SFX a o elo/B dexdào
SFX a o emi/K dexdào
SFX a o gomi/K dexdào
SFX a o i dexdào
SFX a o o/JL dexdào
SFX a o omi/K dexdào
SFX a ao à/FNR [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]stao
SFX a ao àeƚo/B [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]stao
SFX a ao àelo/B [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]stao
SFX a ao àemi/K [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]stao
SFX a ao àgomi/K [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]stao
SFX a ao àomi/K [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]stao
SFX a ao aƚo/B [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]stao
SFX a ao alo/B [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]stao
SFX a ao atu/O [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]stao
SFX a o a/JLPR [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]stao
SFX a o e/JLR [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]stao
SFX a o ga [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]stao
SFX a o gi [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]stao
SFX a o go/JL [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]stao
SFX a o i [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]stao
SFX a o o/JL [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]stao
SFX a ào à/FNR malstào
SFX a ào aƚo/B malstào
SFX a ào aga malstào
SFX a ào agi malstào
SFX a ào ago/JL malstào
SFX a ào alo/B malstào
SFX a ào atu/O malstào
SFX a o a/JLPR malstào
SFX a o eƚo/B malstào
SFX a o e/JLR malstào
SFX a o elo/B malstào
SFX a o emi/K malstào
SFX a o gomi/K malstào
SFX a o i malstào
SFX a o o/JL malstào
SFX a o omi/K malstào
SFX a ào à/FNR movestào
SFX a ào aƚo/B movestào
SFX a ào aga movestào
SFX a ào agi movestào
SFX a ào ago/JL movestào
SFX a ào alo/B movestào
SFX a ào atu/O movestào
SFX a o a/JLPR movestào
SFX a o eƚo/B movestào
SFX a o e/JLR movestào
SFX a o elo/B movestào
SFX a o emi/K movestào
SFX a o gomi/K movestào
SFX a o i movestào
SFX a o o/JL movestào
SFX a o omi/K movestào
SFX a ào à/FNR sotostào
SFX a ào aƚo/B sotostào
SFX a ào aga sotostào
SFX a ào agi sotostào
SFX a ào ago/JL sotostào
SFX a ào alo/B sotostào
SFX a ào atu/O sotostào
SFX a o a/JLPR sotostào
SFX a o eƚo/B sotostào
SFX a o e/JLR sotostào
SFX a o elo/B sotostào
SFX a o emi/K sotostào
SFX a o gomi/K sotostào
SFX a o i sotostào
SFX a o o/JL sotostào
SFX a o omi/K sotostào
SFX a ao à/FNR [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]fao
SFX a ao àeƚo/B [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]fao
SFX a ao àelo/B [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]fao
SFX a ao àemi/K [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]fao
SFX a ao àgomi/K [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]fao
SFX a ao àomi/K [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]fao
SFX a ao aƚo/B [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]fao
SFX a ao alo/B [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]fao
SFX a ao atu/O [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]fao
SFX a o a/JLPR [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]fao
SFX a o e/JLR [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]fao
SFX a o ga [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]fao
SFX a o gi [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]fao
SFX a o go/JL [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]fao
SFX a o i [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]fao
SFX a o o/JL [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]fao
SFX a ào à/FNR konfào
SFX a ào aƚo/B konfào
SFX a ào aga konfào
SFX a ào agi konfào
SFX a ào ago/JL konfào
SFX a ào alo/B konfào
SFX a ào atu/O konfào
SFX a o a/JLPR konfào
SFX a o eƚo/B konfào
SFX a o e/JLR konfào
SFX a o elo/B konfào
SFX a o emi/K konfào
SFX a o gomi/K konfào
SFX a o i konfào
SFX a o o/JL konfào
SFX a o omi/K konfào
SFX a ào à/FNR kontrafào
SFX a ào aƚo/B kontrafào
SFX a ào aga kontrafào
SFX a ào agi kontrafào
SFX a ào ago/JL kontrafào
SFX a ào alo/B kontrafào
SFX a ào atu/O kontrafào
SFX a o a/JLPR kontrafào
SFX a o eƚo/B kontrafào
SFX a o e/JLR kontrafào
SFX a o elo/B kontrafào
SFX a o emi/K kontrafào
SFX a o gomi/K kontrafào
SFX a o i kontrafào
SFX a o o/JL kontrafào
SFX a o omi/K kontrafào
SFX a ào à/FNR [lƚ]ikuefào
SFX a ào aƚo/B [lƚ]ikuefào
SFX a ào aga [lƚ]ikuefào
SFX a ào agi [lƚ]ikuefào
SFX a ào ago/JL [lƚ]ikuefào
SFX a ào alo/B [lƚ]ikuefào
SFX a ào atu/O [lƚ]ikuefào
SFX a o a/JLPR [lƚ]ikuefào
SFX a o eƚo/B [lƚ]ikuefào
SFX a o e/JLR [lƚ]ikuefào
SFX a o elo/B [lƚ]ikuefào
SFX a o emi/K [lƚ]ikuefào
SFX a o gomi/K [lƚ]ikuefào
SFX a o i [lƚ]ikuefào
SFX a o o/JL [lƚ]ikuefào
SFX a o omi/K [lƚ]ikuefào
SFX a ào à/FNR r[ei]fào
SFX a ào aƚo/B r[ei]fào
SFX a ào aga r[ei]fào
SFX a ào agi r[ei]fào
SFX a ào ago/JL r[ei]fào
SFX a ào alo/B r[ei]fào
SFX a ào atu/O r[ei]fào
SFX a o a/JLPR r[ei]fào
SFX a o eƚo/B r[ei]fào
SFX a o e/JLR r[ei]fào
SFX a o elo/B r[ei]fào
SFX a o emi/K r[ei]fào
SFX a o gomi/K r[ei]fào
SFX a o i r[ei]fào
SFX a o o/JL r[ei]fào
SFX a o omi/K r[ei]fào
SFX a ào à/FNR sorafào
SFX a ào aƚo/B sorafào
SFX a ào aga sorafào
SFX a ào agi sorafào
SFX a ào ago/JL sorafào
SFX a ào alo/B sorafào
SFX a ào atu/O sorafào
SFX a o a/JLPR sorafào
SFX a o eƚo/B sorafào
SFX a o e/JLR sorafào
SFX a o elo/B sorafào
SFX a o emi/K sorafào
SFX a o gomi/K sorafào
SFX a o i sorafào
SFX a o o/JL sorafào
SFX a o omi/K sorafào
SFX a ào à/FNR strafào
SFX a ào aƚo/B strafào
SFX a ào aga strafào
SFX a ào agi strafào
SFX a ào ago/JL strafào
SFX a ào alo/B strafào
SFX a ào atu/O strafào
SFX a o a/JLPR strafào
SFX a o eƚo/B strafào
SFX a o e/JLR strafào
SFX a o elo/B strafào
SFX a o emi/K strafào
SFX a o gomi/K strafào
SFX a o i strafào
SFX a o o/JL strafào
SFX a o omi/K strafào
SFX a ào à/FNR stupefào
SFX a ào aƚo/B stupefào
SFX a ào aga stupefào
SFX a ào agi stupefào
SFX a ào ago/JL stupefào
SFX a ào alo/B stupefào
SFX a ào atu/O stupefào
SFX a o a/JLPR stupefào
SFX a o eƚo/B stupefào
SFX a o e/JLR stupefào
SFX a o elo/B stupefào
SFX a o emi/K stupefào
SFX a o gomi/K stupefào
SFX a o i stupefào
SFX a o o/JL stupefào
SFX a o omi/K stupefào
SFX a ào à/FNR torefào
SFX a ào aƚo/B torefào
SFX a ào aga torefào
SFX a ào agi torefào
SFX a ào ago/JL torefào
SFX a ào alo/B torefào
SFX a ào atu/O torefào
SFX a o a/JLPR torefào
SFX a o eƚo/B torefào
SFX a o e/JLR torefào
SFX a o elo/B torefào
SFX a o emi/K torefào
SFX a o gomi/K torefào
SFX a o i torefào
SFX a o o/JL torefào
SFX a o omi/K torefào
SFX a ào à/FNR tumefào
SFX a ào aƚo/B tumefào
SFX a ào aga tumefào
SFX a ào agi tumefào
SFX a ào ago/JL tumefào
SFX a ào alo/B tumefào
SFX a ào atu/O tumefào
SFX a o a/JLPR tumefào
SFX a o eƚo/B tumefào
SFX a o e/JLR tumefào
SFX a o elo/B tumefào
SFX a o emi/K tumefào
SFX a o gomi/K tumefào
SFX a o i tumefào
SFX a o o/JL tumefào
SFX a o omi/K tumefào
