public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.dic
èduko/aJL
ñaolar/aE
óndulo/aJL
đenaralixar/aE
ŧímolo/aJL
ŧavatar/aE
ŧerco/aJL
ŧirkolar/aE
ƚíbero/aJL
ƚapiar/aE
ƚesar/aE
ƚindar/aE
ƚumar/aE
ɉelar/aE
aŧarto/aJL
abòso/aJL
abuxo/aJL
afadego/aJL
akanar/aE
albedar/aE
altarido/aJL
amontar/aE
ankorar/aE
apano/aJL
apropiar/aE
ardo/aJL
aromatidar/aE
arxentar/aE
asediar/aE
astréndar/aE
augurar/aE
axorno/aJL
bólsego/aJL
badar/aE
balbetar/aE
barafuxolar/aE
bartono/aJL
bato/aJL
bertonar/aE
biaxemar/aE
bitar/aE
bokido/aJL
bordedo/aJL
bràgoƚo/aJL
bragolar/aE
brasoƚar/aE
brontoƚar/aE
bufono/aJL
céñar/aE
ciƚo/aJL
cuco/aJL
daŧiar/aE
dasio/aJL
deƚimo/aJL
defràudo/aJL
deliro/aJL
dentar/aE
deroto/aJL
desejar/aE
desfanto/aJL
desfilo/aJL
desiɉilo/aJL
deskaenaŧo/aJL
deskaròño/aJL
deskoƚar/aE
deskonsejar/aE
deskuƚo/aJL
despólvero/aJL
despato/aJL
despirar/aE
desprométar/aE
desténpero/aJL
destenparar/aE
destrakar/aE
destuar/aE
devedar/aE
dexɉonfar/aE
dexbàfaro/aJL
dexbateđo/aJL
dexbolar/aE
dexbrigar/aE
dexertar/aE
dexgatejo/aJL
dexgredar/aE
dexjoŧar/aE
dexluvio/aJL
dexmexuro/aJL
dexnoar/aE
dexrovejar/aE
dexveso/aJL
disipar/aE
docar/aE
doperar/aE
eƚímino/aJL
ekuivokar/aE
eràdego/aJL
esténdar/aE
evidenŧio/aJL
exarsito/aJL
fénxar/aE
faƚar/aE
falsidiar/aE
farmar/aE
favorexar/aE
festexar/aE
fiaskexo/aJL
fisar/aE
fodro/aJL
formalixar/aE
frítego/aJL
frameđo/aJL
fraskexo/aJL
frexio/aJL
fufiñar/aE
fuxiƚar/aE
gabar/aE
garbeƚo/aJL
godegar/aE
graduar/aE
griƚio/aJL
guarentar/aE
ilkamar/aE
inđalo/aJL
inŧaro/aJL
inɉémaro/aJL
inalòko/aJL
inarpexar/aE
inbòŧo/aJL
inbajòko/aJL
inbarbajo/aJL
inbeletar/aE
inbojar/aE
inbotar/aE
inbreno/aJL
inbusolar/aE
incodar/aE
indebitar/aE
indoronar/aE
infèto/aJL
infasoƚar/aE
infilsar/aE
informigar/aE
infraskono/aJL
ingaɉo/aJL
ingarbeƚo/aJL
ingolfar/aE
ingreɉo/aJL
inguxelar/aE
inkòŧo/aJL
inkadeno/aJL
inkanalo/aJL
inkapuso/aJL
inkastèlo/aJL
inkavalkar/aE
inkokar/aE
inkorđar/aE
inkrostar/aE
inkusoƚar/aE
inmaco/aJL
inmojar/aE
inonbrio/aJL
inpòco/aJL
inpaketo/aJL
inparsialixo/aJL
inpeñar/aE
inpeluko/aJL
inpiòko/aJL
inpoɉar/aE
inpresionar/aE
inraixo/aJL
insólfaro/aJL
insarar/aE
insenpiar/aE
inskéƚetro/aJL
insolfarar/aE
inspino/aJL
insukar/aE
intòrđar/aE
intardegar/aE
intarsio/aJL
intensionar/aE
interogar/aE
intorkolar/aE
intratèñar/aE
intronar/aE
invado/aJL
inveƚeno/aJL
invesigar/aE
inxaƚo/aJL
inxoɉèlo/aJL
irisar/aE
ispesionar/aE
istuar/aE
jelomarar/aE
kànforo/aJL
kórar/aE
kaɉo/aJL
kalkíxolo/aJL
kanŧono/aJL
kanpo/aJL
karakoƚar/aE
karnevalar/aE
katàstego/aJL
kauterixar/aE
klono/aJL
kokolar/aE
komisiono/aJL
kondanar/aE
konpanedar/aE
konso/aJL
kontrapexo/aJL
korniđar/aE
krékolo/aJL
krostoƚino/aJL
kuereƚar/aE
laño/aJL
legalixar/aE
logar/aE
mòldar/aE
maƚuxo/aJL
mamalukar/aE
mareƚar/aE
maskerar/aE
merkantidar/aE
molđo/aJL
muarar/aE
núvolo/aJL
nolidar/aE
oltrepaso/aJL
organedo/aJL
pànteđo/aJL
paŧientar/aE
paliđar/aE
parametrixar/aE
parsonalidar/aE
pasturo/aJL
peritar/aE
peteđar/aE
piandotar/aE
pispoƚar/aE
ponaro/aJL
pràtego/aJL
presto/aJL
prontar/aE
puteƚo/aJL
rúmego/aJL
ranŧiño/aJL
rasomeɉo/aJL
reƚievar/aE
recamo/aJL
reformar/aE
rekalŧo/aJL
relèđar/aE
rengraŧio/aJL
reprimo/aJL
respenđo/aJL
reuxo/aJL
riduŧar/aE
robar/aE
rosteƚo/aJL
sàgomo/aJL
sòrbar/aE
sakramento/aJL
saponar/aE
scamo/aJL
scopeto/aJL
sekuro/aJL
serkar/aE
sfexo/aJL
sforsar/aE
sfruto/aJL
simiotar/aE
sixiƚo/aJL
skacixo/aJL
skanpanòto/aJL
skarnifegar/aE
skavaƚo/aJL
skoɉono/aJL
skonpaxenar/aE
skortèlo/aJL
skrinso/aJL
skurŧar/aE
solèvo/aJL
sorafar/aE
sotiƚixar/aE
spéŧego/aJL
spacarar/aE
spantegar/aE
spaveno/aJL
sperđurar/aE
spiolar/aE
spontiñar/aE
spuƚexo/aJL
stajuso/aJL
stenpro/aJL
storđar/aE
strafào/aJL
stranudo/aJL
striar/aE
suŧo/aJL
surogar/aE
taɉusar/aE
tarapienar/aE
tavanar/aE
terar/aE
tonexo/aJL
traŧar/aE
tramexo/aJL
trasino/aJL
tresko/aJL
truso/aJL
vèrdar/aE
vango/aJL
varxèlo/aJL
verdedo/aJL
vinifegar/aE
vulnarar/aE
xɉanŧar/aE
xbésolo/aJL
xbailo/aJL
xbarlefar/aE
xbeketar/aE
xbigatar/aE
xbosar/aE
xbrindoƚar/aE
xdereno/aJL
xganbetar/aE
xgonbrar/aE
xgrenxo/aJL
xiràndoƚo/aJL
xlaino/aJL
xliedo/aJL
xmòrgolo/aJL
xmarejar/aE
xmergolar/aE
xnónboƚo/aJL
xrègolo/aJL
xvansar/aE
xvetoƚar/aE
